Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
429]

UNIFORM
UNINCORPORATED NONPROFIT ASSOCIATION ACT

Section

429-1 Definitions

429-2 Supplementary general principles of law and
equity

429-3 Territorial application

429-4 Real and personal property; nonprofit
association as

legatee, devisee, or beneficiary

429-5 Statement of authority as to real property

429-6 Liability in contract and tort

429-7 Capacity to assert and defend; standing

429-8 Effect of judgment or order

429-9 Disposition of personal property of inactive
nonprofit

association

429-10 Appointment of agent to receive service of
process

429-11 Claim not abated by change

429-12 Venue

429-13 Summons and complaint; service on whom

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next